Rhode Island, session 2025, SB220.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-7.4-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-7.4 entitled "The
Healthcare Services Funding Plan Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-7.4-3. Imposition of healthcare services funding contribution. [As enacted in 2014.]
(a) Each insurer is required to pay the healthcare services funding contribution for each
contribution enrollee of the insurer at the time the contribution is calculated and paid, at the rate set
forth in this section.
(1) Beginning January 1, 2016 July 1, 2025, the secretary shall set the healthcare services
funding contribution each fiscal year in an amount equal to: (i) The child immunization funding
requirement described in § 23-1-46; plus (ii) The adult immunization funding requirement
described in § 23-1-46; plus (iii) The children’s health services funding requirement described in §
42-12-29; plus (iv) The psychiatry resource network funding requirement described in § 23-1-46.2
and all as divided by; (iv)(v) The number of contribution enrollees of all insurers.
(2) The contribution set forth herein shall be in addition to any other fees or assessments
upon the insurer allowable by law.
(b) The contribution shall be paid by the insurer; provided, however, a person providing
health benefits coverage on a self-insurance basis that uses the services of a third-party
administrator shall not be required to make a contribution for a contribution enrollee where the
contribution on that enrollee has been or will be made by the third-party administrator.

(c) The secretary shall create a process to facilitate the transition to the healthcare services
funding contribution method that: (i) assures adequate funding beginning July 1, 2016, (ii) reflects
that funding via the healthcare services funding contribution method initially will be for only a
portion of the state’s fiscal year, and (iii) avoids duplicate liability for any insurer that made a
payment under the premium assessment method in effect prior to January 1, 2016, for a period for
which it would also be liable for a contribution under the healthcare services funding contribution
method as described in this chapter.
SECTION 2. Chapter 23-1 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Health" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-1-46.2. Psychiatry resource network account.
(a) There is created within the general fund a restricted receipt account to be known as the
"PRN account." All money in the account shall be utilized by the department of health to effectuate
coverage for the following services: Existing Rhode Island lines including the PediPRN and
MomsPRN information lines which are available to providers or residents in the state, and which
are funded pursuant to regulation adopted by the director of the department of health. Amounts
collected pursuant to § 42-7.4-3(a)(1)(iv) shall be collected by the department of health and
deposited in the "PRN account." The funds shall be used solely for the purposes of the "PRN
account," and no other.
(b) Each year's psychiatry resource network funding requirement in § 42-7.4-3(a)(1)(iv)
shall be the amount projected by the department of health in subsection (a) of this section less any
projected carryover of excess funds from prior assessments, grants, or other funding and approved
by the PRN advisory committee.
(c) The department of health shall establish a PRN advisory committee, as determined by
the director of the department of health, that shall include, but not be limited to, representatives
from the department of health; the office of the health insurance commissioner; the executive office
of health and human services; the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities,
and hospitals; insurers; and other representatives as indicated.
(d) The department of health shall submit to the general assembly an annual report on the
program and costs related to the program, on or before February 1 of each year. The department
shall make available to each insurer required to make a contribution pursuant to § 42-7.4-3, upon
its request, detailed information regarding the programs described in subsection (a) of this section
and the costs related to those programs
(e) The "PRN account" shall be exempt from the indirect costs recovery provisions of §
35-4-27.
LC000977/SUB A - Page 2 of 7

SECTION 3. Section 35-4-27 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-4 entitled "State Funds"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-4-27. Indirect cost recoveries on restricted receipt accounts. [Effective January 1,
2025.]
Indirect cost recoveries of ten percent (10%) of cash receipts shall be transferred from all
restricted receipt accounts, to be recorded as general revenues in the general fund. However, there
shall be no transfer from cash receipts with restrictions received exclusively: (1) From contributions
from nonprofit charitable organizations; (2) From the assessment of indirect cost-recovery rates on
federal grant funds; or (3) Through transfers from state agencies to the department of administration
for the payment of debt service. These indirect cost recoveries shall be applied to all accounts,
unless prohibited by federal law or regulation, court order, or court settlement. The following
restricted receipt accounts shall not be subject to the provisions of this section:
Executive Office of Health and Human Services
Organ Transplant Fund
HIV Care Grant Drug Rebates
Health System Transformation Project
Rhode Island Statewide Opioid Abatement Account
HCBS Support-ARPA
HCBS Admin Support-ARPA
Department of Human Services
Veterans’ home — Restricted account
Veterans’ home — Resident benefits
Pharmaceutical Rebates Account
Demand Side Management Grants
Veteran’s Cemetery Memorial Fund
Donations — New Veterans’ Home Construction
Commodity Supplemental Food Program-Claims
Department of Health
Pandemic medications and equipment account
Miscellaneous Donations/Grants from Non-Profits
State Loan Repayment Match
Healthcare Information Technology
Healthcare services funding accounts for the psychiatry resource network (PRN)
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
LC000977/SUB A - Page 3 of 7

Eleanor Slater non-Medicaid third-party payor account
Hospital Medicare Part D Receipts
RICLAS Group Home Operations
Group Home Facility Improvement Fund
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Emergency and public communication access account
Department of Environmental Management
National heritage revolving fund
Environmental response fund II
Underground storage tanks registration fees
De Coppet Estate Fund
Rhode Island Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
Historic preservation revolving loan fund
Historic Preservation loan fund — Interest revenue
Department of Public Safety
E-911 Uniform Emergency Telephone System
Forfeited property — Retained
Forfeitures — Federal
Forfeited property — Gambling
Donation — Polygraph and Law Enforcement Training
Rhode Island State Firefighter’s League Training Account
Fire Academy Training Fees Account
Attorney General
Forfeiture of property
Federal forfeitures
Attorney General multi-state account
Forfeited property — Gambling
Department of Administration
OER Reconciliation Funding
Health Insurance Market Integrity Fund
RI Health Benefits Exchange
Information Technology restricted receipt account
Restore and replacement — Insurance coverage
Convention Center Authority rental payments
LC000977/SUB A - Page 4 of 7

Investment Receipts — TANS
OPEB System Restricted Receipt Account
Car Rental Tax/Surcharge-Warwick Share
Grants Management Administration
RGGI-Executive Climate Change Coordinating Council Projects
Electric Vehicle Charging Stations Operating and Maintenance Account
Department of Housing
Housing Resources and Homelessness Restricted Receipt Account
Housing Production Fund
Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Fund
Department of Revenue
DMV Modernization Project
Jobs Tax Credit Redemption Fund
Legislature
Audit of federal assisted programs
Department of Children, Youth and Families
Children’s Trust Accounts — SSI
Military Staff
RI Military Family Relief Fund
RI National Guard Counterdrug Program
Treasury
Admin. Expenses — State Retirement System
Retirement — Treasury Investment Options
Defined Contribution — Administration - RR
Violent Crimes Compensation — Refunds
Treasury Research Fellowship
Business Regulation
Banking Division Reimbursement Account
Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner Reimbursement Account
Securities Division Reimbursement Account
Commercial Licensing and Racing and Athletics Division Reimbursement Account
Insurance Division Reimbursement Account
Historic Preservation Tax Credit Account
Marijuana Trust Fund
LC000977/SUB A - Page 5 of 7

Social Equity Assistance Fund
Judiciary
Arbitration Fund Restricted Receipt Account
Third-Party Grants
RI Judiciary Technology Surcharge Account
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Statewide Student Transportation Services Account
School for the Deaf Fee-for-Service Account
School for the Deaf — School Breakfast and Lunch Program
Davies Career and Technical School Local Education Aid Account
Davies — National School Breakfast & Lunch Program
School Construction Services
Office of the Postsecondary Commissioner
Higher Education and Industry Center
IGT STEM Scholarships
Department of Labor and Training
Job Development Fund
Contractor Training Restricted Receipt Account
Rhode Island Council on the Arts
Governors’ Portrait Donation Fund
Statewide records management system account
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC000977/SUB A
========
LC000977/SUB A - Page 6 of 7